Louisiana, session 2026, HB96.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:65(F) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§65. Drag racing and racing on public roads and certain property; exemptions
* * *
F. Any law enforcement agency authorized to enforce traffic regulations in
this state shall have the authority to impound, at the owner's expense, any vehicle
driven in a manner that violates this Section for up to fourteen not less than thirty
days to gather evidence pertaining to the offense. If the owner of the vehicle has not
violated this Section, that owner may claim the vehicle from the impound facility
once notified by law enforcement. In addition, if the vehicle driven in a manner that
violates this Section has been rented from a car rental agency, only the driver of the
vehicle shall be subject to higher fines and the total cost of impound fees. The car
rental agency, or person who owns the vehicle, may claim the vehicle from the
impound facility once notified by law enforcement.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-538 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 96